Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.035

Legal, medical expenses—May be paid from earnings of the principal funds and administrative fund.

(1) The state board is authorized to pay from the earnings of the principal funds and administrative fund lawful obligations of the system for legal expenses and medical expenses which expenses are primarily incurred for the purpose of protecting the principal funds or are incurred in compliance with statutes governing such funds.

(2)(a) The term "legal expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal services provided through the legal services revolving fund, fees for expert witnesses, travel expenses, fees for court reporters, cost of transcript preparation, and reproduction of documents.

(b) The term "medical costs" includes, but is not limited to, expenses for the medical examination or reexamination of members or retirees, the costs of preparation of medical reports, and fees charged by medical professionals for attendance at discovery proceedings or hearings.

[ 2023 c 73 s 8; 1999 c 148 s 4; 1989 c 194 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 73: See note following RCW 41.24.800.

Effective date—1989 c 194 ss 1, 2, and 3: See note following RCW 41.24.030.